Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-213
Secretary of
State; record; public examination.

The Secretary
of State shall keep for public examination a record of all trade names registered
or renewed under sections 87-208 to 87-219.01.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 6, p. 2102;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 11;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 13.